Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4-241] False or misleading
statements. No solicitation subject to this part shall be made by means of
any proxy statement, form of proxy, notice of meeting, or other communication,
written or oral, containing any statement which at the time and in the light of
the circumstances under which it is made, is false or misleading with respect
to any material fact, or which omits any material fact necessary in order to
make the statements not false or misleading or necessary to correct any
statement in any earlier communication with respect to the solicitation of a
proxy for the same meeting or subject matter which has become false or
misleading. [L 2000, c 24, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next